Nebraska, session 109, LB634.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB634 LB634
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 12 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Legislative Sunset Review Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Legislative Sunset Review Act:
(1)(a) Advisory committee means any examining or licensing board,
council, advisory council, committee, task force, coordinating council,
commission, or board of trustees created to provide advice or
recommendations to any state agency or other entity of state government;
and
(b) Advisory committee does not include the Legislative Sunset
Review Committee; and
(2)(a) Reviewable entity means any of the following that were
created by the Legislature:
(i) Board;
(ii) Council;
(iii) Committee;
(iv) Task force;
(v) Commission;
(vi) Fund;
(vii) Program; or
(viii) Any other entity, body, or position; and
(b) Reviewable entity does not include:
(i) Any entity, body, or position that was not created by the
Legislature; and
(ii) Any committee of the Legislature.
Sec. 3. (1) The Legislative Sunset Review Committee is created for
the purpose of reviewing reviewable entities and proposing legislation to
eliminate or modify such reviewable entities.
(2) The Legislative Sunset Review Committee is comprised of the
following members:
(a) The chairperson of the Executive Board of the Legislative
Council;
-2-

LB634 LB634
2025 2025
(b) The chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the
Legislature; and
(c) Five other members of the Legislature to be chosen by the
Executive Board of the Legislative Council. When selecting the five other
members, the executive board shall ensure that the Legislative Sunset
Review Committee includes adequate geographic representation.
(3) The chairperson and vice-chairperson of the committee shall be
elected by majority vote of the committee.
(4) The initial members of the committee shall be appointed as soon
as possible after January 1, 2026, and thereafter the committee shall be
appointed at the beginning of each regular legislative session.
(5) The committee shall have staff support from the various
legislative divisions and staff.
Sec. 4. (1) The Legislative Sunset Review Committee shall create a
schedule to perform sunset reviews of reviewable entities, with the
initial sunset reviews beginning in 2027. Each reviewable entity shall be
scheduled for review every five years.
(2) Such schedule shall be published on the Legislature's website.
Sec. 5. (1) Not later than the beginning of the legislative session
in the year in which a reviewable entity is scheduled to be reviewed, the
reviewable entity shall electronically submit a report to the Clerk of
the Legislature that includes:
(a) The performance measures for each program and activity provided
by the reviewable entity and three years of data for each measure that
provides actual results for the immediately preceding two years and
projected results for the fiscal year that begins in the year that the
reviewable entity report is scheduled to be submitted to the Legislature;
(b) An explanation of factors that have contributed to any failure
to achieve the legislative standards;
(c) The promptness and effectiveness with which the reviewable
entity disposes of complaints concerning persons affected by the
-3-

LB634 LB634
2025 2025
reviewable entity;
(d) The extent to which the reviewable entity has encouraged
participation by the public in making its rules and decisions as opposed
to participation solely by those it regulates and the extent to which
public participation has resulted in rules compatible with the objectives
of the reviewable entity;
(e) The extent to which the reviewable entity has complied with
applicable requirements of state law and applicable rules regarding
purchasing goals and programs for small and minority-owned businesses;
(f) A statement of any statutory objectives intended for each
program and activity, the problem or need that the program and activity
were intended to address, and the extent to which these objectives have
been achieved;
(g) An assessment of the extent to which the jurisdiction of the
reviewable entity and its programs overlap or duplicate those of other
reviewable entities and the extent to which the programs can be
consolidated with those of other reviewable entities;
(h) An assessment of less restrictive or alternative methods of
providing services for which the reviewable entity is responsible which
would reduce costs or improve performance while adequately protecting the
public;
(i) An assessment of the extent to which the reviewable entity has
corrected deficiencies and implemented recommendations contained in
reports of the Auditor of Public Accounts, legislative interim studies,
and federal audit entities;
(j) The process by which the reviewable entity actively measures
quality and efficiency of services it provides to the public;
(k) The extent to which the reviewable entity complies with public
records requirements under sections 84-712 to 84-712.09 and the Open
Meetings Act;
(l) The extent to which alternative program delivery options, such
-4-

LB634 LB634
2025 2025
as privatization, outsourcing, or insourcing, have been considered to
reduce costs or improve services to residents of this state;
(m) Recommendations to the Legislature for statutory, budgetary, or
regulatory changes that would improve the quality and efficiency of
services delivered to the public, reduce costs, or reduce duplication;
(n) The effect of federal intervention or loss of federal funds if
the reviewable entity is terminated;
(o) A list of each advisory committee relating to the reviewable
entity, including those established in statute and those established by
managerial initiative, and for each advisory committee:
(i) The purpose, activities, composition, and related expenses of
the advisory committee;
(ii) The extent to which the purposes of the advisory committee have
been achieved; and
(iii) The rationale for continuing or eliminating the advisory
committee;
(p) Programs or functions of the reviewable entity that are
performed without specific statutory authority; and
(q) Other information requested by the Legislature.
(2) Information and data reported by the reviewable entity shall be
validated by the person administrating the reviewable entity before
submission to the Legislature.
Sec. 6. (1) Upon receipt of any report under section 5 of this act,
the Legislative Sunset Review Committee may and the appropriate
legislative committee shall conduct a review of the reviewable entity and
its advisory committees, including an examination of the cost of each
program of the reviewable entity, an evaluation of best practices and
alternatives that would result in the administration of the reviewable
entity in a more efficient or effective manner, an examination of the
viability of privatization or a different reviewable entity performing
the functions, and an evaluation of the cost and consequences of
-5-

LB634 LB634
2025 2025
discontinuing the reviewable entity.
(2) The reviews shall be comprehensive in scope and shall consider
the information provided by the reviewable entity report in addition to
information deemed necessary by the appropriate committee.
Sec. 7. No later than December 15 of the year in which a reviewable
entity or its advisory committees are scheduled to be reviewed, the
Legislative Sunset Review Committee shall:
(1) Review the information submitted by the reviewable entity and
the reports of any independent reviews directed by the committee,
including those conducted by Auditor of Public Accounts;
(2) Send a copy of the report and recommendation to the
Appropriations Committee of the Legislature and the Auditor of Public
Accounts;
(3) Hold public hearings to consider this information as well as
other information and testimony that the Legislative Sunset Review
Committee deems necessary; and
(4) Present to the Speaker of the Legislature a report on the
reviewable entities and advisory committees scheduled to be reviewed that
year by the Legislature. In the report, the Legislative Sunset Review
Committee shall include its specific findings and recommendations
regarding the information considered pursuant to section 8 of this act,
make recommendations as described in section 9 of this act, and propose
legislation as it considers necessary.
Sec. 8. The Legislative Sunset Review Committee may consider
information submitted pursuant to section 5 of this act as well as any
additional information it considers relevant in determining whether a
public need exists for the continuation of a reviewable entity or its
advisory committees or for the performance of any of the functions of the
reviewable entity or its advisory committees.
Sec. 9. In its report on any reviewable entity, the Legislative
Sunset Review Committee shall:
-6-

LB634 LB634
2025 2025
(1) Make recommendations on the termination, continuation, or
reorganization of each reviewable entity and its advisory committees and
on the need for the performance of the functions of the reviewable entity
and its advisory committees;
(2) Make recommendations on the consolidation, transfer, or
reorganization of programs within reviewable entities not under review
when the programs duplicate functions performed in reviewable entities
under review; and
(3) Propose legislation in the next regular legislative session to
carry out the recommendations of the Legislative Sunset Review Committee.
Sec. 10. (1) Any unobligated and unexpended appropriations of any
terminated reviewable entity or advisory committee shall lapse to the
General Fund on the date of termination.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section or as
otherwise provided by law, all money in a terminated fund is transferred
to the General Fund. Any law dedicating the money to a fund of a
terminated entity becomes void on the date of termination.
(3)(a) If not otherwise provided by law, property in the custody of
a terminated reviewable entity or advisory committee shall be transferred
to the Department of Administrative Services.
(b) If not otherwise provided by law, records in the custody of a
terminated reviewable entity or advisory committee shall be transferred
to the Department of Administrative Services.
(4)(a) The Legislature recognizes the state's continuing obligation
to pay bonds and all other financial obligations, including contracts,
loans, promissory notes, lease-purchase agreements, certificates of
participation, installment sales contracts, master equipment financing
agreements, and any other form of indebtedness, incurred by the state or
any reviewable entity terminated pursuant to the Legislative Sunset
Review Act.
(b) The Legislative Sunset Review Act shall not impair or impede the
-7-

LB634 LB634
2025 2025
payment of bonds and other financial obligations, or any other covenant
contained in the legal documents authorizing the issuance of debt or the
execution of any other financial obligation in accordance with their
terms.
(c) If the state or a terminated reviewable entity has outstanding
bonds or other outstanding financial obligations, the bonds and all other
financial obligations remain valid and enforceable in accordance with
their terms and subject to all applicable terms and requirements
contained in the legal documents authorizing the issuance of debt or the
execution of any other financial obligation.
(d) If not otherwise provided by law, the Department of
Administrative Services shall carry out all covenants contained in the
bonds and in the resolutions authorizing the issuance of bonds, and
perform all obligations required thereby. The state or a designated state
agency shall provide for the payment of the bonds and all other financial
obligations from the sources of payment specified in the resolution or
legal documents authorizing the issuance or execution thereof in
accordance with the terms of the bonds or other financial obligations,
whether from taxes, specified revenues, or otherwise, until the bonds and
interest on the bonds are paid in full and all other financial
obligations are performed and paid in full.
(e) All funds or accounts established by laws or legal documents
authorizing the issuance of bonds, or the execution of other financial
obligations, shall remain with the previously designated party.
(f) Any money or accounts held by a terminated reviewable entity
shall be transferred to a designated successor in compliance with the
resolution or legal documents applicable to the outstanding bonds or
other financial obligations.
Sec. 11. (1) The Legislative Sunset Review Committee may, for
purposes of conducting a sunset review:
(a) Investigate any matter within the scope of a sunset review
-8-

LB634 LB634
2025 2025
either completed or being conducted by the Legislative Sunset Review
Committee; or
(b) Exercise any power vested in a standing committee of the
Legislature.
(2) The Legislative Sunset Review Committee may access or request
information and request assistance of reviewable entities, state
agencies, and officers. When assistance is requested, a reviewable
entity, state agency, or officer shall assist the Legislative Sunset
Review Committee.
(3) In carrying out the Legislative Sunset Review Act, the
Legislative Sunset Review Committee or its designated staff member may
inspect the records, documents, or files of any reviewable entity or
state agency.
Sec. 12. Except as otherwise expressly provided by law, termination
of a reviewable entity does not affect any right or duty that matured,
penalty that was incurred, civil or criminal liability that arose, or
proceeding that was begun before the termination.
Sec. 13. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 14. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
50-419.03, 50-435, 50-1401, 50-1402, 50-1403, and 50-1404, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-9-